dictsource/mn_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Translation rules for Mongolian

.group а
       а             a
        
.group б
       б             p
             
.group в 
       в             v
        
.group г
       г (L01   X 
       г (L02   g        
       L01) г (L03   X   // syllable final /g/ preceded by back vowel
       L02) г (L03   g   // syllable final /g/ preceded by front vowel
       L01) г (_     X   // word final /g/ preceded by back vowel
       L02) г (_     g   // word final /g/ preceded by front vowel

.group д
       д             d
       

.group е
       е             е
       

.group ё
       ё            jo
       
       
.group ж
       ж            dZ
       
       
.group з
       з             z
       
.group и
       и             i


.group й 
       й             j
       
       
.group к

.group к
        к        k

.group қ
        қ        q

.group л
        л        l

.group м
        м        m

.group н
        н        n
        
.group о
        о        o

.group ө
        ө        W

.group п
        п        p

.group р
        р        r

.group с
        с        s

.group т
        т        t

.group у
        у        w


.group ү
        ү        y

.group ф
        ф        f

.group х
        х        x2

.group ц
        ц        ts

.group ч
        ч        tS

.group ш
        ш        S

.group щ
        щ        StS

.group ъ
        ъ        ?

.group ы
        ы        I

.group і
        і        I

.group ь
        ь        ?

.group э
        э        E

.group ю
        ю        ju

.group я
        я        ja
      
